Utah statutes.
7-7-32.   Agreements committing assets to lines of credit -- Stock ownership
or affiliation with credit card companies.
An association may, subject to Section 7-7-33, commit its assets to lines of
credit under credit agreements and credit card agreements with its credit card
holders and with other credit card issuers, and pay and agree to pay
obligations incurred in connection with those agreements, and become a member
or stockholder of, or become otherwise affiliated with, any credit card
corporation, association, or other issuer.  The commissioner may, by rule,
limit the percentage of assets that may be invested in such lines of credit,
but the limitation may not be more restrictive than that of the Office of
Thrift Supervision or successor federal agency for federally chartered
associations.
